Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.220

Separating estrays from herd.

It shall be the duty of any and all persons searching or hunting for stray horses, mules or cattle, to drive the band or herd in which they may find their stray horses, mules or cattle, into the nearest corral before separating their said stray animals from the balance of the herd or band; that in order to separate their said stray animals from the herd or band, the person or persons owning said stray shall drive them out of and away from the corral in which they may be driven before setting the herd at large.

[ 1989 c 286 s 16; 1987 c 202 s 181; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 14; Code 1881 s 2537; RRS s 3050. Prior: 1869 pp 408, 409 ss 1, 2. Formerly RCW 16.28.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.